District of Columbia statutes.
1-1210

Certification of certain instruments; depositions; administration of oaths and affirmations; affidavits.

Each notary public shall have power to take and to certify the acknowledgment or proof of powers of attorney, mortgages, deeds, and other instruments of writing, to take depositions and to administer oaths and affirmations and also to take affidavits to be used before any court, judge, or officer within the District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 568
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 2, 23 DCR 2544
This section is referenced in § 1-1211.
1981 Ed., § 1-810.
1973 Ed., § 1-511.